Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3113.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-19-37 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-19 entitled "Conduct of
Election and Voting Equipment, and Supplies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-19-37. Tabulation of state returns — Certificate of election. Tabulation of state
and federal returns – Certificate of election.
The state board shall proceed to tabulate the state and federal election returns and declare
the results as provided in chapter 22 of this title, and any candidate at the election challenging the
result as applied to him or her may petition the board within seven (7) nine (9) days after the
declaration to conduct a recount of the votes cast in the candidate’s election according to the
provisions set forth in § 17-19-37.1. After the completion of the recount, and as soon as it can do
so consistent with its other duties, the state board shall issue a certificate of election to the state and
federal candidate it determines to have been elected.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004583
========